Arkansas, session 2025, HB1927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Acts 2025, No. 408, § 23, is amended to read as follows:
SECTION 23. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2026 2025 is essential to the operation
of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided; with the
exception that Sections 15 and 20 in this Act shall be in full force and
effect from and after the date of its passage and approval; and that in the
event of an extension of the Session, the delay in the effective date of this
Act beyond July 1, 2026 2025, with the exception that Sections 15 and 20 in
this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its
passage and approval, could work irreparable harm upon the proper
administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore,
an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in
*MBM211*
03/31/2025 1:46:53 PM MBM211

HB1927
full force and effect from and after July 1, 2026 2025; with the exception of
Sections 15 and 20 in this Act shall be in full force and effect from and
after the date of its passage and approval.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the office of the Secretary of
State provides vital services, including without limitation the regulation of
elections and the registration of business entities, that preserve the public
peace, health, and safety; that due to an error in Acts 2025, No. 408,
funding for the office would lapse when its current appropriation expires at
the end of the current fiscal year; and that the immediate effectiveness of
this act is necessary to preserve the public peace, health, and safety as it
will ensure that funding for the office is in place at the beginning of the
next fiscal year and allow proper planning for the fiscal operations of the
office. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being
immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and
safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.













03/31/2025 1:46:53 PM MBM211